Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 5. Salt Water Sport Fishing Services.

Sec. 16.40.260.
Sport fishing operator license.

[Repealed, § 8, ch. 70, SLA 2004, as amended by § 3, ch. 61, SLA 2009, § 1, ch. 48, SLA 2010, § 1, ch. 13, SLA 2011, and § 1, ch. 30, SLA 2012.]

Sec. 16.40.261.
Salt water sport fishing operator license.

History.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 30 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 16.40.270.
Sport fishing guide license.

[Repealed, § 8, ch. 70, SLA 2004, as amended by § 3, ch. 61, SLA 2009, § 1, ch. 48, SLA 2010, § 1, ch. 13, SLA 2011, and § 1, ch. 30, SLA 2012.]

Sec. 16.40.271.
Salt water sport fishing guide license; combined operator and guide license.

History.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 30 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 16.40.280.
Reports.

[Repealed, § 8, ch. 70, SLA 2004, as amended by § 3, ch. 61, SLA 2009, § 1, ch. 48, SLA 2010, § 1, ch. 13, SLA 2011, and § 1, ch. 30, SLA 2012.]

Sec. 16.40.290.
Penalty.

[Repealed, § 8, ch. 70, SLA 2004, as amended by § 3, ch. 61, SLA 2009, § 1, ch. 48, SLA 2010, § 1, ch. 13, SLA 2011, and § 1, ch. 30, SLA 2012.]

Sec. 16.40.291.
Penalty.

History.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 30 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 16.40.299.
Definitions.

[Repealed, § 8, ch. 70, SLA 2004, as amended by § 3, ch. 61, SLA 2009, § 1, ch. 48, SLA 2010, § 1, ch. 13, SLA 2011, and § 1, ch. 30, SLA 2012.]

Sec. 16.40.300.
Definitions.

History.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 30 SLA 2016.]